Arkansas statutes. Title 7 Elections
Chapter 5 Election Procedure Generally
Subchapter 5

— Voting Machines

Effective Dates.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 13, § 10: approved Apr. 17, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the present election laws are ancient and outdated in part and have caused and are causing much confusion and controversy, that there are particular problem areas in the present law which need immediate legislation in order to resolve same, that elections are and will continue to be held and conducted in this atmosphere of confusion and controversy until these problem areas are resolved and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act shall be in force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1970 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 25, § 3: Approved Mar. 13, 1970. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas, the election laws require that voting machines used in any election must remain locked and sealed for ten (10) days after the election, thereby rendering it impossible for the appropriate committee charged with conducting the election to program such machines for any immediate, successive run-off election; that preferential and general primary elections will be held and conducted in the immediate future and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall be in force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 2005, No. 2233, § 48: Jan. 1, 2006.

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 117: Apr. 10, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes various revisions to Arkansas election laws that are designed to improve the administration of elections and special elections and that these revisions should be implemented as soon as possible so that the citizens of this state may benefit from improved election procedures. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

7-5-501. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning acquisition — places of installation, was repealed by Acts 2005, No. 2233, § 9. The section was derived from Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 12, §§ 3, 5; 1979, No. 738, §§ 1, 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 3-1203, 3-1203.1, 3-1205; Acts 1991, No. 843, § 1; 1995, No. 774, § 1; 1997, No. 446, § 1.

7-5-502. Application of election laws and penalties.

All laws of this state applicable to elections where voting is done in any manner other than by machines and all penalties prescribed for violation of these laws shall apply to elections and precincts where voting machines are used insofar as they are applicable.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 12, § 33; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1233.

7-5-503. Examination and approval of machines by State Board of Election Commissioners.

(a)

Any person or corporation selling voting machines may apply to exhibit machines to the State Board of Election Commissioners.

(b)

The state board shall examine the machine and file a report of its accuracy, efficiency, and capacity with the office of the Secretary of State.

(c)

If the kind of machine examined complies with the requirements of §7-5-504 and can be safely used by voters at elections under the conditions prescribed, the machine shall be deemed approved by the state board, and machines of its kind may be adopted for use at elections if selected for use by the Secretary of State. When the machine has been approved, any improvement or change that does not impair its accuracy, efficiency, or capacity shall not render necessary a reexamination or reapproval.

(d)

A form of voting machine not approved cannot be used at any election.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 12, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1201; Acts 2005, No. 2233, § 10.

7-5-504. Machine specifications.

No make of voting machine shall be approved for use unless it is so constructed that:

(1)

It will ensure secrecy to the voter in the act of voting;

(2)

It shall provide the capacity for voting for or against as many questions as may be submitted;

(3)

It shall permit the voter to vote separately for the candidate of his or her choice for each office or position to be voted upon and to vote separately on each issue to be decided by election;

(4)

It shall permit the voter to vote for as many persons for an office for whom he or she is lawfully entitled to vote, but no more;

(5)

It shall prevent the voter from voting for the same candidate or question more than one (1) time;

(6)

It shall permit the voter to verify in a private and independent manner the votes selected by the voter on the ballot before the ballot is cast;

(7)

It shall provide the voter with the opportunity in a private and independent manner to change the ballot or correct any error before the ballot is cast;

(8)

If it is a direct recording electronic voting machine, it shall include a voter-verified paper audit trail, except as provided under §7-5-301(b);

(9)

If the voter is legally entitled to select only one (1) candidate for an office but the voter selects more than one (1) candidate for the office, it shall notify the voter before the ballot is cast that he or she has selected more than one (1) candidate for the office on the ballot, notify the voter of the effect of casting multiple votes for the office, and provide the voter with the opportunity to correct the ballot before the ballot is cast;

(10)

It shall permit the voter to vote for or against any question on which he or she may have the right to vote, but no other;

(11)

It shall be capable of being programmed to display for voting purposes only the voter's proper ballot;

(12)

It shall correctly register and record and accurately count all votes cast for any and all persons and for or against any and all questions;

(13)

It shall be provided with a protective device to prevent any unauthorized operation of the machine before or after the election;

(14)

It shall be provided with a counter or tabulator which shall show at all times during the election how many persons have voted;

(15)

It shall be so equipped and constructed so that it can be made inaccessible to further voting after the polls have closed and all voters who were in line at the time the polls closed have voted;

(16)

It shall permit a voter to vote in any election for any person for whom he or she wishes to vote when the person's name does not appear upon the voting machine;

(17)

It bears a unique numerical, alphabetical, or alphanumeric sequence identifier that distinguishes it from any other machine;

(18)

It shall be provided with a screen, hood, or partition which shall allow the voter to vote a secret ballot;

(19)

It shall be capable of being operated from an alternate power source should the need arise;

(20)

It shall permit voters with disabilities to vote unassisted if they so desire; and

(21)

It shall be:

(A)

Qualified by an authorized federal agency or national testing and standards laboratory which is acceptable to the Secretary of State;

(B)

Approved by the State Board of Election Commissioners; and

(C)

Selected by the Secretary of State.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 12, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1202; Acts 2005, No. 654, § 1; 2005, No. 2233, § 11; 2015, No. 1218, § 5.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment substituted “the capacity” for “facilities” in (2); added “If it is a direct recording electronic voting machine” in (8); and rewrote (17) and (21)(A).

7-5-505, 7-5-506. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

These sections, concerning guarantee and supervisory personnel required and purchase by sealed bid — uniformity of machines, were repealed by Acts 2005, No. 2233, § 9. The sections were derived from the following sources:

7-5-505. Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 12, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1206.

7-5-506. Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 12, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1204; Acts 1997, No. 446, § 2.

7-5-507. Demonstration — Assistance in operating machine.

(a)(1)

The manufacturer shall demonstrate the machine to the county election officials prior to the first election at which the machines are placed in use.

(2)

The date for the demonstration shall be agreed upon by the vendor and the county board of election commissioners.

(b)

On the date of the first election at which voting machines are used, manufacturers shall make employees available in each county where the machines are in operation to assist the county board of election commissioners in any manner that will expedite voting and provide efficient operation of voting machines. After the first election, the county board of election commissioners shall obtain the assistance needed in operating the machines, and the county board of election commissioners shall collect and pay expenses for this assistance as it would for any other election cost.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 12, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1208; Acts 1997, No. 446, § 3; 2005, No. 2233, § 14; 2015, No. 1218, § 6.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment inserted designations (a)(1) and (a)(2); inserted “county” in (a)(1); and substituted “agreed upon by the vendor and” for “set by” in (a)(2).

7-5-508. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning custody and use of machines — costs, was repealed by Acts 2005, No. 2233, § 15. The section was derived from Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 12, § 7; 1970 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 5, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1207; Acts 1997, No. 446, § 4.

7-5-509. Machines used for demonstration.

(a)(1)

The county board of election commissioners may designate suitable times and places where voting machines shall be exhibited for the purpose of giving instructions in their use to all voters who apply for instruction.

(2)

Public notice of the times and places where voting machines will be exhibited shall be given at least forty-eight (48) hours before the first date of demonstration by publication one (1) time in one (1) or more daily or weekly newspapers published in the town, city, or county using the machines if a newspaper is published in the town, city, or county.

(b)(1)

The location of voting machines for demonstration shall be in accessible public buildings.

(2)

The voting machines used for demonstration shall display sample ballots showing the title of offices to be filled and, as far as practicable, the names of the candidates in the next election.

(c)

No voting machine that is to be assigned for use in any election shall be used for instruction after having been prepared and secured for the election. Machines shall not be used for demonstration purposes during the time that the polls are open on election day or if the demonstration shall in any way interfere with the proper adjustment, securing, or use of the machine in the election.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 12, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1211; Acts 2005, No. 2233, § 16; 2015, No. 1218, § 7.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment inserted designation (a)(1); added (a)(2); inserted designations (b)(1) and (b)(2); and rewrote (b)(1).

7-5-510. Forms for complaints about function of voting machine — Investigation.

(a)

At each polling place at which voting machines are used, the county board of election commissioners shall provide forms that voters may use for complaints about the function of a voting machine. The complaint form shall include space for the following information:

(1)

The name, address, and telephone number of the person making the complaint;

(2)

The identification number of the voting machine;

(3)

The complaint; and

(4)

Such other information concerning the complaint as the State Board of Election Commissioners determines to be appropriate to carry out the intent of this section.

(b)(1)

A voter may file a complaint form with a poll worker who shall forward the complaint form to the county board of election commissioners.

(2)

A copy of each complaint shall be provided to the Elections Division of the Secretary of State.

(3)

It shall be the duty of the county board of election commissioners to investigate complaints regarding the function of a voting machine.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 562, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1235; Acts 1997, No. 446, § 5; 2009, No. 959, § 23; 2015, No. 1218, § 8.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment substituted “a poll worker” for “an election official” in (b).

The 2015 amendment inserted designation (b)(1); inserted (b)(2); and inserted designation (b)(3).

7-5-511. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning ballot label — definition — form — content, was repealed by Acts 2005, No. 2233, § 17. The section was derived from Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 12, § 9; 1975, No. 358, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1209; Acts 1987, No. 247, § 4; 1991, No. 356, §§ 1, 2; 1997, No. 446, § 6.

7-5-512. Certification of ballot styles — Equipment furnished to polling sites.

(a)

It shall be the duty of the county board of election commissioners to prepare and certify the ballot styles for the voting machine.

(b)

In addition, the county board of election commissioners shall furnish any election materials and supplies as may be necessary or as may be required by law.

(c)

The voting machine shall be delivered by the county board of election commissioners to the election officials at each polling site.

(d)

The county board of election commissioners shall supply each precinct with clear, written instructions suitable for the instruction of voters that illustrate the manner of voting on the machine.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 12, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1212; Acts 1997, No. 446, § 7; 2005, No. 2233, § 18; 2007, No. 222, § 9.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment rewrote (b).

7-5-513. Machine breakdown — Delivery of ballot materials.

The county board of election commissioners in any county in which voting machines are to be used shall be ready at any time on election day to deliver ballots, ballot boxes, replacement voting machines, if available, or other necessary equipment required by law for voting to any precinct in the county, town, or city upon notice that any voting machine is out of order or fails to work.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 12, § 31; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1231; Acts 1997, No. 446, § 8; 2005, No. 2233, § 19.

7-5-514. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning authority to use both machines and ballots, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 446, § 9. The section was derived from Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 12, §§ 31, 32; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 3-1231, 3-1232.

7-5-515. Preparation of machines for election — Logic and accuracy testing and public testing.

(a)

Immediately upon the proper certification of candidates and questions, the county board of election commissioners shall oversee programming of the election, proof the ballots, prepare the voting machines, and test and adjust the voting machines for the election.

(b)

In performing these functions, the county board of election commissioners may be assisted by experts appointed or employed by the county board of election commissioners.

(c)(1)(A)

As soon as the election media is prepared, but no later than seven (7) days before the beginning of voting, the county board of election commissioners, with respect to all elections except a runoff election under subdivision (c)(1)(B) of this section, shall conduct logic and accuracy testing by having all election media tested to ascertain that the voting system has been correctly configured and will correctly tabulate the votes cast for all offices and on all measures.

(B)

As soon as the election media is prepared, but no later than five (5) days before the beginning of voting, the county board of election commissioners, with respect to a runoff election, shall conduct logic and accuracy testing by having all runoff election media tested to ascertain that the voting system has been correctly configured and will correctly tabulate the votes cast for all offices and on all measures.

(2)

In addition to the logic and accuracy testing under subdivision (c)(1) of this section, the county board of election commissioners shall conduct public testing as follows:

(A)

The county board of election commissioners shall give public notice of the time and place of the test at least forty-eight (48) hours prior to the public test by publication one (1) time in one (1) or more daily or weekly newspapers published in the town, city, or county using the machines if a newspaper is published in the town, city, or county;

(B)

The public test shall be open to representatives of the political parties, candidates, media, and the public;

(C)(i)

The public test shall be conducted by processing a preaudited group of test ballots that are to be voted on the machines so as to record a predetermined number of valid votes for each candidate and on each measure.

(ii)

The public test shall include for each office one (1) or more ballots which have votes in excess of the number allowed by law in order to test the ability of the machines to reject the votes; and

(D)

If any error is detected, the cause shall be ascertained and corrected and an errorless count shall be made before the machine is approved.

(d)

After completion of the logic and accuracy test and the public test, the ballots and programs used shall be sealed, retained, and disposed of as provided by law.

(e)

After completion of the logic and accuracy test and the public test, the county board of election commissioners shall certify the accuracy of the voting system by:

(1)

Sending a copy of the electronic results to the Secretary of State; and

(2)

Filing the test results with the county clerk.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 12, §§ 10, 13; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 3-1210, 3-1213; Acts 1997, No. 446, § 10; 2005, No. 2233, § 20; 2009, No. 1480, § 33; 2015, No. 1218, § 9; 2017, No. 164, § 1; 2019, No. 966, § 6[5].

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment rewrote (c)(1).

The 2015 amendment added “Logic and accuracy testing and public testing” in the section heading; substituted “these functions” for “this function” in (b); redesignated and rewrote (c); inserted “logic and accuracy test and the public” in (d); and rewrote (e).

The 2017 amendment redesignated former (c)(1) as (c)(1)(A); in (c)(1)(A), substituted “days before” for “days prior to” and inserted “except a runoff election under subdivision (c)(1)(B) of this section”; and added (c)(1)(B).

The 2019 amendment, in (a), inserted “oversee programming of the election, proof the ballots” and deleted “oversee their programming” preceding “and test and adjust”.

7-5-516. Notice to candidates of preparation — Rules and statutes unaffected.

Before the county board of election commissioners begins the preparation of the machines for any election, it shall publish a notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the county stating:

(1)

The time and place the machines will be prepared for the election; and

(2)

A time at which one (1) representative of each candidate may inspect to see that the machines are in proper condition for use in the election.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 12, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1214; Acts 1997, No. 446, § 11; 2009, No. 959, § 24.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment deleted (b); and substituted “publish a notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the county” for “mail a notice in due time to candidates or any representatives designated by candidates” in the introductory language.

7-5-517. Securing machines — Certification.

(a)

When a voting machine has been properly prepared by the county board of election commissioners and examined by the representatives of the candidates or the candidate himself or herself, it shall be made inaccessible to voting.

(b)(1)

Any device required to activate the machine shall be placed in a package on which shall be written the serial number and the precinct location of the voting machine and the number registered on the device.

(2)

The package shall be sealed in the presence of the representatives of the candidates or the candidates themselves.

(c)

The county board of election commissioners shall then certify, in the presence of the candidates or their representatives, the serial numbers of the machines, and that all question counters are set at zero (000).

(d)

An activation device required for voting on the voting machines shall be kept by the county board of election commissioners until turned over for delivery to the election officials with the election equipment at the polling site for election day.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 12, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1215; Acts 1997, No. 446, § 12; 2005, No. 2233, § 21; 2015, No. 1218, § 10.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment inserted designations (b)(1) and (b)(2); deleted “protective counter or” following “registered on the” in (b)(1); deleted “and the number registered on the protective counter of the machine” at the end of (c); and substituted “An activation” for “Any activator pack or” in (d).

7-5-518. Machines inactivated until polls open — Adjustment of counters.

(a)

The voting machine shall remain inactivated against voting until the polls are formally opened and shall not be operated except by voters for voting.

(b)

If any counter is found not to register zero (000), the poll workers shall immediately notify the county board of election commissioners, who shall cause the counters to be adjusted at zero (000).

(c)(1)

The poll workers shall produce one (1) printout from each machine showing whether the candidate and question counters register zero (000) and shall sign and post the printout upon the wall of the polling room, where it shall remain throughout the election day.

(2)

After the close of voting on election day, the certified printout, signed by the poll workers, shall be:

(A)

Returned to the county board of election commissioners; and

(B)

Filed with the election returns.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 12, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1216; Acts 1997, No. 446, § 13; 2005, No. 2233, § 22; 2007, No. 835, § 1; 2009, No. 959, § 25; 2015, No. 1218, § 11.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment substituted “counter” for “counter or tabulator” in (b).

The 2009 amendment substituted “poll workers” for “election officials” in (b) and (c)(1).

The 2015 amendment rewrote (c)(2).

7-5-519. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning unlocking machine for vote — custody of keys, was repealed by Acts 2005, No. 2233, § 23. The section was derived from Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 12, § 17; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1217; Acts 1997, No. 446, § 14.

7-5-520. Instructions for voters using voting machines.

During the election, each voter shall be instructed regarding the operation of voting machines before voting. The voter's attention shall also be called to the sample ballot, so that the voter shall become familiar with the questions, the names of the offices, and the names of the candidates.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 12, § 18; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1218; Acts 1997, No. 446, § 15; 2005, No. 2233, § 24.

7-5-521. Arrangement of polling place.

(a)

The exterior of the voting machine and every part of the polling place shall be in plain view of the poll workers.

(b)

The machine shall be placed so that no person can see or determine how the voter casts his or her vote.

(c)

After the opening of the polls, the poll workers shall not allow any person to pass to the part of the room where the machine is situated, except for the purpose of voting.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 12, § 22; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1222; Acts 1997, No. 446, § 16; 2005, No. 2233, § 25; 2009, No. 959, § 26.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment substituted “poll workers” for “election officials” in (a) and (c).

7-5-522. Voting procedure.

(a)(1)

When a voter presents himself or herself for the purpose of voting, the poll workers shall ascertain whether he or she is properly qualified and registered under §7-5-305.

(2)

In preparing the machines, the poll workers shall ensure that each voter will have access only to the proper ballot.

(b)

Only one (1) voter at a time shall be permitted to approach a voting machine. Having cast his or her vote, the voter shall at once move away from the voting machine and leave the polling room by the exit provided.

(c)

A voter having left the voting machine shall not be permitted to return to the voting machine except to complete the voting process.

(d)

If a voter leaves an electronic ballot on a voting machine on which the voter has either made some or no selections and has failed to complete the process of casting the ballot and failed to notify a poll worker of his or her desire to cancel the ballot before departing the polling site, two (2) poll workers shall take action to complete the process of casting the ballot and shall document:

(1)

The time;

(2)

The name of the voter, if known;

(3)

The names of the poll workers completing the process of casting the ballot; and

(4)

All other circumstances surrounding the abandoned ballot.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 12, § 21; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1221; Acts 1989, No. 342, § 1; 1997, No. 446, § 17; 2005, No. 2233, § 26; 2007, No. 835, § 2; 2009, No. 959, § 26.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment added (d).

The 2009 amendment substituted “poll workers” for “election officials” or “election officers” or variants in five places, and made minor stylistic changes.

7-5-523. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning assistance to voters with disabilities, was repealed by Acts 2007, No. 835, § 4. The section was derived from Acts 1995, No. 908, § 2; 1995, No. 1296, § 40; 1997, No. 446, § 18; 2003, No. 1308, § 3; 2005, No. 2233, § 27.

7-5-524. Voter access to machines — Persons in line at closing time.

(a)

During the time that the polls are open for voting, no more voters shall be permitted to approach the voting machine than there are vacant machines available for voting.

(b)

At the time of the closing of the polls, all persons who have presented themselves for voting and who are then in line at the polling place shall be permitted to cast their votes as now provided by law. Every person in line shall have the opportunity to vote.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 12, § 23; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1223.

7-5-525. Write-in votes.

(a)

Votes for any person whose name does not appear on the voting machine as a qualified candidate for office are referred to in this section as write-in votes.

(b)(1)

The voting machine shall be programmed to allow a voter to enter the name of a qualified write-in candidate on the ballot.

(2)

A write-in vote shall be cast in the appropriate place on the ballot, or the vote for that candidate shall be void and not counted.

(c)

Write-in votes shall not be counted in primary elections.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 12, § 20; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1220; Acts 2005, No. 2233, § 28.

7-5-526. Closing of polls — Securing machines — Poll workers' certificate.

(a)

At the official time for closing the polls and upon termination of the voting, the poll workers shall announce that the polls have closed and in the presence of all persons authorized to be present shall remove the activation devices from the voting machines to make them inaccessible to further voting.

(b)

At the same time, the poll workers shall sign a certificate provided by the county board of election commissioners stating that the machines were made inaccessible to further voting and giving the exact time and the number of votes shown on the public counters.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 12, § 24; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1224; Acts 1997, No. 446, § 19; 2005, No. 2233, § 29; 2009, No. 959, § 27; 2015, No. 1218, § 12.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment substituted “poll workers” for “election officials” in (a) and (b).

The 2015 amendment deleted “packs or” following “activation” in (a).

7-5-527. Exposure of count — Verification — Return record — Official signatures.

(a)

The poll workers shall then expose the count in the presence of all persons authorized to be present.

(b)

It is the intention of this section to accord a full, complete, and public view of the count from each voting machine to all poll workers and designated watchers for the candidates or parties.

(c)(1)

The poll worker shall proceed to produce the result record in a minimum of three (3) copies.

(2)(A)

The result record shall be deemed the official count for that machine.

(B)

One (1) copy of the completed return record for that machine shall be posted upon the wall of the polling room for all to see.

(d)

The poll workers shall sign the machine return record produced by the device.

(e)(1)

The activation device used to collect votes from each voting machine and all certified result records shall be placed in a package that shall be sealed and signed by all the poll workers and any watchers that may desire to affix a signature.

(2)(A)

The sealed package shall be immediately returned to the county board of election commissioners by one (1) of the poll workers selected for this purpose, accompanied by those other poll workers and watchers who desire to join the poll worker.

(B)

The poll worker shall obtain a receipt for the sealed package.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 12, §§ 25, 26; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 3-1225, 3-1226; Acts 1997, No. 446, § 20; 2005, No. 2233, § 30; 2009, No. 959, § 27; 2015, No. 1218, §§ 13, 14.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment substituted “poll workers” for “election officials” or variant throughout the section.

The 2015 amendment substituted “result” for “return” in (c)(1) and (c)(2)(A); and, in (e)(1), deleted “pack or” following “activation” and substituted “result” for “return”.

7-5-528. Machines released to officers.

Voting machines shall be released to a person designated by the county board of election commissioners for storage in a secure facility designated by the county board of election commissioners.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 12, § 27; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1227; Acts 1997, No. 446, § 21; 2007, No. 835, § 5.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment substituted “Machines released to officers” for “Proclamation of election results” in the section heading, and rewrote the section.

7-5-529. Tabulation of returns.

(a)

The county board of election commissioners shall compile countywide totals from the activation pack or device used to collect votes from each voting machine.

(b)

Prior to certification of the official election results, the county board of election commissioners shall manually compile countywide totals from the polling location's certified return records and verify that they match the electronically derived totals from the activation pack or device used to collect votes from each machine.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 12, § 28; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1228; Acts 1997, No. 446, § 22; 2005, No. 2233, § 31.

7-5-530. Securing audit materials upon election contest or recount.

(a)

The county board of election commissioners shall produce an audit log for each voting machine used in the election.

(b)

In the event that there is an election contest filed, the judge of the court that has jurisdiction may order the county board of election commissioners to secure the audit logs and the voter-verified paper audit trail alleged in the contest to be in question. The county board of election commissioners shall store them in a secure place in the county courthouse under lock and key awaiting further orders of the court.

(c)

In the event that any candidate in any election in which the machines have been utilized or any voter who questions the count of any question posed at any election gives written notice to the county board of election commissioners that he or she desires a recount, then the applicable county board of election commissioners shall secure the audit logs and voter-verified paper audit trails and store them in a secure place in the county courthouse awaiting further orders of the applicable county board of election commissioners or court.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 12, § 29; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1229; Acts 1997, No. 446, § 23; 2005, No. 2233, § 32; 2007, No. 835, § 6.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment substituted “Securing audit materials upon election contest or recount” for “Machines released to officials — Impounding upon election contest or recount” in the section heading; and rewrote the section.

7-5-531. Retention of audit data — Machines to remain secured until results are certified except on court order.

(a)

All audit logs and voter-verified paper audit trails produced by a voting machine shall remain secured for a period of two (2) years.

(b)(1)

All voting machines used in any election shall remain secured for a period of at least three (3) days following the election unless the machines are ordered to be activated sooner by and on the authority of an order of a court of competent jurisdiction, in the event that the issue of the election should be in judicial controversy.

(2)

Should no order be entered, it shall be the duty of the county board of election commissioners to clear the machines for future elections after the results of the election have been certified.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 12, § 30; 1970 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 25, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1230; Acts 1997, No. 446, § 24; 2005, No. 2233, § 33.

7-5-532. Direct-recording electronic voting machines — Definitions.

(a)

For purposes of this section:

(1)

“Direct-recording electronic voting machine” means a voting machine that:

(A)

Records votes by means of a ballot display provided with mechanical or electro-optical components that may be actuated by the voter;

(B)

Processes the data by means of a computer program;

(C)

Records voting data and ballot images in internal or external memory components; and

(D)

Produces a tabulation of the voting data stored in a removable memory component and in a printed copy; and

(2)

“Voter-verified paper audit trail” means a contemporaneous paper record of a ballot printed for the voter to confirm his or her votes before the voter casts his or her ballot.

(b)

The Secretary of State or the county shall not purchase or procure a direct-recording electronic voting machine that does not include a voter-verified paper audit trail.

(c)(1)

All direct-recording electronic voting machines in use on or after January 1, 2006, shall include a voter-verified paper audit trail, except for those direct-recording electronic voting machines in use during the 2004 general election.

(2)

All direct-recording electronic voting machines purchased on or after August 12, 2005, shall include a voter-verified paper audit trail.

(d)

A direct-recording electronic voting machine with a voter-verified paper audit trail shall meet the following conditions:

(1)

The voter-verified paper audit trail may be verified by the voter before the casting of the voter's ballot;

(2)

The voter-verified paper audit trail shall not be retained by the voter;

(3)

The voter-verified paper audit trail shall not contain individual voter information;

(4)

The paper used in producing the voter-verified paper audit trail shall be sturdy, clean, and resistant to degradation; and

(5)

The voter-verified paper audit trail shall be readable in a manner that makes the voter's ballot choices obvious to the voter without the use of computer or electronic code.

(e)

Voter-verified paper audit trails shall be preserved in the same manner and for the same time period that ballots and certificates are preserved under §7-5-702.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 654, § 2; 2007, No. 835, § 7; 2009, No. 959, § 28; 2013, No. 1126, § 6.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment deleted (e)(1).

The 2013 amendment substituted “Direct-recording” for “Direct” in the introductory language of (a)(1).

Subchapter 6

— Paper Ballots and Electronic Vote Tabulating Devices

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment by Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 34, substituted “Paper Ballots and Electronic Vote Tabulating Devices” for “Electronic Voting” in the subchapter heading.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1977, No. 77, § 10: Jan. 31, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the election laws of this state authorize counties to use voting machines in primary, general, special, and school elections, but do not authorize the use of electronic voting systems which have been developed by modern technology, and that it is essential to the efficient operation of elections in this state that election officials in the respective counties be authorized to use electronic voting systems which meet the standards prescribed in this act, and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary in order to enable local election officials to follow procedures established in this act in establishing electronic voting systems prior to the next regular primary and general elections. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 738, § 6: Apr. 6, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the election laws of this state permit the citizens of municipalities and counties to express their binding preference for the acquisition and use of voting machines or electronic voting systems only upon the approval of the question of their use at a general election, and present laws prohibit the mixed use of such machines and systems, and that the efficient and economic conduct of elections requires that local election officials and taxpayers have all reasonable options readily available in organizing and conducting elections at the earliest date. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, order, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2005, No. 2233, § 48: Jan. 1, 2006.

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 117: Apr. 10, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes various revisions to Arkansas election laws that are designed to improve the administration of elections and special elections and that these revisions should be implemented as soon as possible so that the citizens of this state may benefit from improved election procedures. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”